Connecticut, session 2026, HB05522.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 22a-424a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Sewage treatment plant or collection system" means any sewage
treatment plant, water pollution control facility, related pumping
station, collection system or other public sewage works;
(2) "Sewage spill" means the diversion of wastes from any portion of
a sewage treatment plant or collection system in this state;
(3) "Combined sewer" means structures which are designed to
convey both sanitary and storm sewage, and allow the overflow of such
combined sewage, untreated, to the waters of the state during periods
of high flows; and
(4) "Electronic report" means a reporting form that uses an electronic
format as prescribed by the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection.
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5522
(b) On and after July 1, 2013, the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall post, on the department's Internet web
site, a map of the state indicating where sewage spills, anticipated
combined sewer overflows and permitted sewage bypasses occur. The
Internet web site shall include all information posted pursuant to
subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section and shall be current.
(c) (1) On and after July 1, 2014, not later than two hours after receipt
of any report submitted pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection,
the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection shall post,
on the department's Internet web site, notice of any such reported
sewage spills and permitted sewage bypasses. Any notice or report
posted pursuant to this subsection shall contain the following relevant
information as best determined by the operator of the sewage treatment
plant or collection system that filed the subject report: (A) The estimated
volume or rate of discharge and, once known, the final volume
discharged; (B) the level of treatment of the discharge; (C) the date and
time the incident occurred; (D) the location of the discharge; (E) once
known, the estimated or actual time the discharge ceased; (F) the
geographic area impacted by the discharge; (G) once known, the steps
taken to contain the discharge; (H) reasonable public health, safety or
welfare concerns or environmental concerns; and (I) public safety
precautions that should be taken.
(2) On and after July 1, 2018, not later than two hours after becoming
aware of any sewage spill or permitted sewage bypass, the operator of
a sewage treatment plant or collection system shall submit an electronic
report to the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection that
includes all of the information required for any notice or report posted
in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
Such report shall be updated by the operator on a daily basis for each
additional day that the sewage spill or permitted sewage bypass
continues after the submittal of the initial report and until such time as
the sewage spill or permitted sewage bypass ceases. Any such report
shall be posted on the Internet web site of such operator.
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5522
(3) On and after July 1, 2018, not later than two hours after becoming
aware of any sewage spill or permitted sewage bypass that reaches a
water body or may come in contact with the general public, the operator
of a sewage treatment plant or collection system shall notify the chief
elected official, or such official's designee, and the local public health
official of the municipality where the sewage spill or permitted sewage
bypass occurred and the chief elected official, or such official's designee,
and the local public health official of any municipality that may be
potentially impacted downstream by such spill or sewage bypass. As
soon as practicable, but not later than two hours after receipt of any such
notice pursuant to this subdivision, each such chief elected official, in
conjunction with the local public health official, shall inform the public
of any sewage spill or permitted sewage bypass that has the potential to
impact public health, safety or the environment. Any such information
provided to the public may be provided through the use of social media
and shall be provided in each predominant language spoken by the
residents of such municipality. The Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall require such operator to post a sign at
the location of such spill or sewage bypass that contains the information
provided to public officials pursuant to this subsection. Any such sign
shall be posted within the timeframe prescribed by the commissioner.
(4) Not later than December 1, [2021] 2026, the Department of Energy
and Environmental Protection shall implement a real-time public
notification system that is separate from and independent of any social
media platform, through which the public may [choose to be notified of]
sign up to receive alerts directly to such person's phone via text message
or electronic mail, of any sewage spills or permitted sewage bypasses as
such sewage spills or permitted sewage bypasses are reported
electronically to said department. Such real-time public notifications
shall occur not later than two hours after said department's receipt of
any such report.
(5) Not later than February 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection shall publish and
make publicly available on the department's Internet web site an annual
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5522
report that includes a summary of the sewage spills that occurred within
each municipality during such year, a summary of sewage spills that
reached named or identified water bodies, a summary of the total
volume of each category of sewage spill and any enforcement actions
taken by the department related to such sewage spills.
(d) Any report to the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection that is required pursuant to section 22a-430-3 of the
regulations of Connecticut state agencies shall be submitted as an
electronic report.
(e) The failure to file an electronic report pursuant to any provision
of this section shall be deemed a violation of the provisions of this
section for purposes of section 22a-438.
Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes and not later than January 1, 2027, shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to the environment on the
100 Department of Energy and Environmental Protection's protocols for
101 interacting with the Department of Public Health and local departments
102 of health in the event of private well contamination in a community.
103 Such report shall detail any prohibitions on the sharing of information
104 among such public agencies and the reasons for such prohibitions.
105 Additionally, such report shall detail the degree to which the
106 Department of Energy and Environmental Protection canvasses a
107 community in the event of such private well contamination to enable
108 potentially affected homeowners and commercial property owners to
109 learn about such contamination and take any requisite or recommended
110 steps to ensure the health and safety of private wells in the community.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 22a-424a
Sec. 2 from passage New section
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5522
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5